Washington statutes.
RCW 35.82.270

Powers are additional.

The powers conferred by RCW 35.82.240 through 35.82.270 shall be in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law, and nothing contained herein shall be construed as limiting any other powers of any housing authority.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.82.270. Prior: 1941 c 69 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 6889-23d. Formerly RCW 74.24.270.]